test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-4lex_jotolah_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - jotolâh: # ok
    jotolâh+N+Sg+Nom: joˊtolâh
    jotolâh+N+Sg+Gen: joˊtoluv
    jotolâh+N+Sg+Acc: joˊtoluv
    jotolâh+N+Sg+Ill: joˊtolâhân
    jotolâh+N+Sg+Loc: joˊtoluṿâst
    jotolâh+N+Sg+Com: joˊtoluvváin
    jotolâh+N+Sg+Abe: joˊtoluvttáá
    jotolâh+N+Ess: joˊtolâhhân
    jotolâh+N+Par: joˊtolâhhâd
    jotolâh+N+Pl+Nom: joˊtoluṿah
    jotolâh+N+Pl+Gen: joˊtoluṿâi
    jotolâh+N+Pl+Acc: joˊtoluṿâi
    jotolâh+N+Pl+Ill: joˊtoluvváid
    jotolâh+N+Pl+Loc: joˊtoluṿâin
    jotolâh+N+Pl+Com: joˊtoluṿâiguin
    jotolâh+N+Pl+Abe: joˊtoluṿâittáá

  Noun - siholdâh: # ok
    siˊholdâh+N+Sg+Nom: siˊholdâh
    siˊholdâh+N+Sg+Gen: siˊholduv
    siˊholdâh+N+Sg+Acc: siˊholduv
    siˊholdâh+N+Sg+Ill: siˊholdâhân
    siˊholdâh+N+Sg+Loc: siˊholduṿâst
    siˊholdâh+N+Sg+Com: siˊholduvváin
    siˊholdâh+N+Sg+Abe: siˊholduvttáá
    siˊholdâh+N+Ess: siˊholdâhhân
    siˊholdâh+N+Par: siˊholdâhhâd
    siˊholdâh+N+Pl+Nom: siˊholduṿah
    siˊholdâh+N+Pl+Gen: siˊholduṿâi
    siˊholdâh+N+Pl+Acc: siˊholduṿâid
    siˊholdâh+N+Pl+Ill: siˊholduvváid
    siˊholdâh+N+Pl+Loc: siˊholduṿâin
    siˊholdâh+N+Pl+Com: siˊholduṿâiguin
    siˊholdâh+N+Pl+Abe: siˊholduṿâittáá
    
  Noun - čácádâh: # ok
    čácádâh+N+Sg+Nom: čáˊcádâh
    čácádâh+N+Sg+Gen: čáˊcáduv
    čácádâh+N+Sg+Acc: čáˊcáduv
    čácádâh+N+Sg+Ill: čáˊcádâhân
    čácádâh+N+Sg+Loc: čáˊcáduṿâst
    čácádâh+N+Sg+Com: čáˊcáduvváin
    čácádâh+N+Sg+Abe: čáˊcáduvttáá
    čácádâh+N+Ess: čáˊcádâhhân
    čácádâh+N+Par: čáˊcádâhhâd
    čácádâh+N+Pl+Nom: čáˊcáduṿah
    čácádâh+N+Pl+Gen: čáˊcáduṿâi
    čácádâh+N+Pl+Acc: čáˊcáduṿâid
    čácádâh+N+Pl+Ill: čáˊcáduvváid
    čácádâh+N+Pl+Loc: siˊholduṿâin
    čácádâh+N+Pl+Com: čáˊcáduṿâiguin
    čácádâh+N+Pl+Abe: čáˊcáduṿâittáá
